Utah statutes.
78B-14-610 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of this state may enforce a child-support order of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state, but the registered order may be modified only if the requirements of Section 78B-14-611, 78B-14-613, or 78B-14-615 have been met.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

